apertium-ru-uk.uk.dix
<pardef n="об/идва__num">
  <e>       <p><l>идва</l>      <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ох</l>        <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ом</l>        <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>идва</l>      <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="nn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ох</l>        <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="aa"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ома</l>       <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ох</l>        <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>идва</l>      <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ох</l>        <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ом</l>        <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>идва</l>      <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="nn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ох</l>        <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="aa"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ома</l>       <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ох</l>        <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>идві</l>      <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ох</l>        <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ом</l>        <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>идві</l>      <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="nn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ох</l>        <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="aa"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ома</l>       <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ох</l>        <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>идвоє</l>     <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>идвох</l>     <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>идвом</l>     <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>идвоє</l>     <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="nn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>идвох</l>     <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="aa"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>идвома</l>    <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>идвох</l>     <r>идва<s n="num"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="обидва">          <i>об</i><par n="об/идва__num"/></e>
